Utah statutes.
53-7-206.   Equipment for new fire protection systems -- Standard equipment.
All equipment for fire protective purposes, purchased in connection with the
installation of completely new fire protection systems by any authorities
having charge of public property, shall be equipped with the standard hydrant
stem and cap nuts and standard threads for fire hose and fire hydrant
couplings and fittings designated as the national standard, as adopted by the
board, which standard is designated as the standard for the equipment in the
state.
